Wisconsin, session 2025, AB27.
do enact as follows:AB27,15Section 1. 36.27 (2) (b) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB27,2,2636.27 (2) (b) 5. A person who is a resident of and living in this state at the time 1of registering at an institution, and who is a veteran as described under s. 45.01 2(12) (fm), is entitled to the exemption under par. (a).AB27,23Section 2. 36.27 (3p) (a) 1r. g. of the statutes is created to read:AB27,2,5436.27 (3p) (a) 1r. g. The person meets the criteria described under s. 45.01 5(12) (fm).AB27,36Section 3. 38.24 (8) (a) 1r. g. of the statutes is created to read:AB27,2,8738.24 (8) (a) 1r. g. The person meets the criteria described under s. 45.01 (12) 8(fm).AB27,49Section 4. 45.01 (12) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:AB27,2,121045.01 (12) (fm) A person who was naturalized pursuant to section 2 (1) of the 11federal Hmong Veterans’ Naturalization Act of 2000, P.L. 106-207, and resides in 12this state.AB27,513Section 5. 45.44 (3) (c) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB27,2,151445.44 (3) (c) (intro.) A veteran, as defined in s. 45.01 (12) (a) to (f) (fm), or one 15of the following:AB27,616Section 6. 45.51 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB27,2,181745.51 (2) (a) 1. A veteran, other than a veteran described under s. 45.01 (12) 18(fm).AB27,2,1919